Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 1. Homicide
§ 6-2-106.
Homicide by vehicle; aggravated homicide by vehicle; penalties.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a person is guilty of homicide by vehicle and shall be fined not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both, if he operates or drives a vehicle in a criminally negligent manner, and his conduct is the proximate cause of the death of another person. Evidence of a violation of any state law or ordinance applying to the operation or use of a vehicle or to the regulation of traffic, except for evidence of a violation of W.S.

10-6-103

,

31-5-233

and

41-13-206

, is admissible in any prosecution under this subsection.

A person is guilty of aggravated homicide by vehicle and shall be punished by imprisonment in the penitentiary for not more than twenty (20) years, if:

While operating or driving a vehicle in violation of W.S.

10-6-103

,

31-5-233

or

41-13-206

, he causes the death of another person and the violation is the proximate cause of the death; or

He operates or drives a vehicle in a reckless manner, and his conduct is the proximate cause of the death of another person.

The department of transportation shall revoke the license or permit to drive and the nonresident operating privilege of any person convicted of aggravated homicide by vehicle or of homicide by vehicle.

Any person convicted of aggravated homicide by vehicle for causing the death of another person while operating or driving a vehicle in violation of W.S.

31-5-233

shall not be issued an ignition interlock restricted license under W.S.

31-5-233

or

31-7-401

through

31-7-404

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 139, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-5-1117; Laws 1980, ch. 50, § 1; 1982, ch. 75, § 4; 1983, ch. 171, § 5; 1984, ch. 44, § 2; 1985, ch. 215, § 2; 1987, ch. 92, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2009, ch. 160, § 1.

Cross references. —

For definition of “criminal negligence” and “vehicle,” see §

6-1-104

.

As to revocation of driver's license or operating privilege on conviction under this section, see §

31-7-127

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (d).

Former provision unconstitutional. —

Former § 31-5-1117(b) (see now subsection (a) of this section), as it existed prior to the 1983 revision of this title, was unconstitutional and inoperative, due to ambiguity and internal inconsistency; therefore, the defendant, who was involved in a vehicular homicide, could only be prosecuted under former § 6-4-107 (see now §

6-2-105

). State v. Sodergren, 686 P.2d 521,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1984).

Section is not unconstitutionally vague.

See Armijo v. State, 678 P.2d 864,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1984).

Subsection (b) was not unconstitutionally vague, in that it gave the defendant notice of the proscribed conduct, and in that the defendant — who was intoxicated and who failed to stop at a stop sign, striking another vehicle and killing its occupants — indicated he understood the hazard of the criminal sanction for his behavior when he repeatedly asked a witness to the accident not to tell the authorities that he had been driving the vehicle. Felske v. State, 706 P.2d 257,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 558

(Wyo. 1985).

Subsection (b) is not void for vagueness, in that: (1) it gives notice to a reasonable person of the conduct prohibited, evidenced, in the case at hand, by the defendant's attempt to remove empty beer bottles from his vehicle following an accident; (2) it imports a general criminal intent; and (3) it encompasses an element of causation, i.e, there cannot be a violation unless the proximate cause of death was drinking and driving under the influence to a degree which renders the defendant incapable of safely operating the vehicle. Hodgins v. State, 706 P.2d 655,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 555

(Wyo. 1985) (decided under facts existing prior to 1983 revision of this title).

This section is clear enough for the man of ordinary intelligence to understand and, thus, is not unconstitutionally vague. Caton v. State, 709 P.2d 1260,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 621

(Wyo. 1985).

Subsection (b) is not unconstitutional on equal protection
grounds. —

The legislature recognized the seriousness of the harm caused when death results from a violation of §

31-5-233

(driving under the influence) and provided for a correspondingly stiffer penalty. Hodgins v. State, 706 P.2d 655,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 555

(Wyo. 1985).

Section imports only a general criminal intent.

Armijo v. State, 678 P.2d 864,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1984).

Evidence sufficient. —

Evidence was insufficient to convict defendant of aggravated homicide by vehicle as the evidence did not show that she acted recklessly because she never admitted she was fatigued, let alone that she consciously disregarded any fatigue; she told a trooper that she did not think she fell asleep; there was direct evidence that she was not impaired; evidence that she failed to steer and brake both before and after striking the sedan, coupled with her lack of knowledge of what happened might support a reasonable inference she fell asleep, but it did not support the jury’s conclusion that she acted recklessly; and neither trooper testified that defendant ever suggested she was fatigued or not well-rested. Hightower v. State, 2020 WY 152, 477 P.3d 103,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2020).

Conviction proper despite incomplete complaint. —

The state's failure to specifically tailor its indictment and complaint under a particular subsection does not preclude it from specifically asserting one particular provision, (b)(i) or (b)(ii), as violated according to the evidence presented. Glazier v. State, 843 P.2d 1200,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1992).

Distinction between aggravated and misdemeanor vehicular homicide.—

It is difficult to define the line of demarcation between criminal negligence and recklessness in vehicular homicide cases in which the driver causing the accident fell asleep at the wheel, and the distinction is whether the defendant consciously disregarded a substantial and unjustifiable risk, or whether he failed, through negligence, to perceive that risk; what distinguishes the felony from the misdemeanor is the level of awareness of a substantial and unjustifiable risk, and the degree of conscious disregard or perception depends upon the facts of each case. Barrowes v. State, 2017 WY 23, 390 P.3d 1126,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2017).

Aggravated homicide conviction where defendant fell asleep at wheel.—

Where defendant fell asleep at the wheel of his double trailer rig and caused a fatal crash, the jury could have found he consciously disregarded a substantial risk because he knew he was tired but continued to drive, he admitted he consciously put his schedule ahead of tiredness, and the risk of death from a crash involving his vehicle was substantial; the jury could have gone either way, but it was the jury's decision to make, and the evidence was sufficient to support the conviction of aggravated homicide by vehicle. Barrowes v. State, 2017 WY 23, 390 P.3d 1126,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2017).

State need not prove voluntary intoxication. —

Aggravated vehicular homicide (subsection (b)(i)) is a general intent crime. The act which the state must prove is voluntary operation of the vehicle, but voluntary intoxication is not an element which the state must prove. Felske v. State, 706 P.2d 257,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 558

(Wyo. 1985).

Death must be proximately caused by driving under influence.
—

Subsection (b) requires that the death be proximately caused by the proscribed conduct of driving under the influence. Felske v. State, 706 P.2d 257,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 558

(Wyo. 1985) (decided under facts existing prior to 1983 revision of this title).

Death caused by driving vehicle while so intoxicated, driver
incapable of driving safely. —

See Felske v. State, 706 P.2d 257,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 558

(Wyo. 1985).

Victim's conduct and causation. —

Evidence of cocaine metabolites found in victim driver's urine was relevant on the issue of actual cause of death in a prosecution for aggravated vehicular homicide arising out of an intersection collision. Buckles v. State, 830 P.2d 702,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1992).

Where cocaine metabolites were found in the victim driver's blood, and the victim was driving very slowly, proceeding into a controlled intersection on a yellow light that turned red and was looking away from the approaching vehicle, the trial court, in a prosecution for aggravated vehicular homicide, should have instructed the jury that the victim's negligence could be considered when determining the defendant's conduct and the proximate cause of the collision at the intersection. Buckles v. State, 830 P.2d 702,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1992).

In an aggravated vehicular homicide case, the trial court abused its discretion in excluding evidence relevant to defense, where the excluded evidence, which pertained to defendant's claim that the victim caused the accident by grabbing the steering wheel of the car defendant was driving, was crucial to defendant's theory that his conduct was not the proximate cause of the accident and the victim's death.
Edwards v. State, 2007 WY 146, 167 P.3d 636,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2007).

Evidence which showed that defendant's blood contained traces of marijuana was relevant

where the prosecution had presented evidence which indicated that the presence of marijuana in the defendant's blood could have impaired his driving ability, and evidence which demonstrated that the defendant's driving ability was impaired could lend support to the conclusion that he was driving his vehicle in a reckless manner pursuant to subsection (b)(ii). Candelaria v. State, 895 P.2d 434,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1995), overruled in part, Allen v. State, 2002 WY 48, 43 P.3d 551,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2002).

Subsection (b) applied to situation in which victim was passenger in defendant-driver's vehicle,

and not another driver. Meadows v. State, 708 P.2d 1250,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 610

(Wyo. 1985).

And in which victim was pedestrian. —

The legislature intended that subsection (b)(i) (aggravated vehicular homicide) would apply to a case in which a drunk driver killed a pedestrian. The status of the victim, whether he is a pedestrian or the driver of another vehicle, is irrelevant. Caton v. State, 709 P.2d 1260,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 621

(Wyo. 1985) (decided under facts existing prior to 1984 amendment).

Construction with manslaughter statute. —

Equal protection argument that the involuntary manslaughter and aggravated vehicular homicide statutes govern the same conduct fails because the involuntary manslaughter and the vehicular homicide statutes do not govern identical or even substantially similar conduct; that both statutes proscribe an unintentional killing is not sufficient identity of the elements. Small v. State, 689 P.2d 420,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1984), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 1224, 105 S. Ct. 1215, 84 L. Ed. 2d 356, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 1062 (U.S. 1985).

Vehicular homicide statute (former § 31-5-1117(a)) did not bar conviction for manslaughter (former § 6-4-107).

See Sodergren v. State, 715 P.2d 170,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1986) (plurality opinion).

Judicial decision as to charging defendant with manslaughter,
not vehicular homicide, not unforeseeable. —

The decision in State v. Sodergren, 686 P.2d 521,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1984), that manslaughter, under former § 6-4-107, was the appropriate charge, rather than vehicular homicide under former § 31-5-1117(a), (b), did not effect an unforeseeable expansion of narrow and precise statutory language by judicial interpretation, nor did it depart from the position taken by the supreme court in previous cases. The court was interpreting the vehicular homicide statute for the first time, so there was no prior interpretation upon which to rely. Furthermore, conduct such as the defendant's had long been recognized as falling within the ambit of the manslaughter statute. Sodergren v. State, 715 P.2d 170,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1986) (plurality opinion).

Conflicting-penalty provision inapplicable to contention that
defendant charged with wrong crime. —

The defendant, who was properly charged with, and convicted of, manslaughter, but who contended throughout his trial and appeal that he should have been charged with vehicular homicide, was properly sentenced under the manslaughter statute. Both the previous (§ 6-4-107) and the current (§

6-2-105

) statutes proscribing manslaughter provide for a sentence of up to 20 years in the state penitentiary. The defendant's interpretation and application of § 6-1-101(c) (conflicting penalties) was inappropriate; he was never charged with or convicted of vehicular homicide. Sodergren v. State, 715 P.2d 170,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1986).

Defense of self-defense not available. —

Affirmative defense of self-defense was not available to defendant charged with vehicular homicide, since crime involved a reckless act, rather than an intentional act. Duran v. State, 990 P.2d 1005,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1999), overruled, Haire v. State, 2017 WY 48, 393 P.3d 1304,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2017).

For construction of term “criminal negligence”
in former manslaughter statute. —

See State v. Catellier, 63 Wyo. 123, 179 P.2d 203,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1947); Bartlett v. State, 569 P.2d 1235,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1977), overruled, Nowack v. State, 774 P.2d 561,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1989).

Essentials of “reckless disregard of the safety of others.”
—

The term “reckless disregard of the safety of others” of course implies a much greater dereliction in hazarding the safety of others than ordinary negligence. However, it does not require any intent to do harm either generally, or to the victim in particular. What is essential is that it be shown beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant drove in a manner that he knew, or should have known was highly dangerous to others, and that he did so intentionally, or heedlessly, with a careless indifference to the consequences. State v. Rideout, 450 P.2d 452,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1969) (decided under prior law).

Facts that a person who had been drinking to such an extent that it impaired his driving ability, drove his vehicle at 60 to 65 miles per hour on a dark night upon the wrong portion of the highway for no apparent reason, and collided with a motorcycle with an operating headlight would constitute sufficient evidence to sustain the finding that he was driving a motor vehicle in reckless disregard of others. Booth v. State, 517 P.2d 1034,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1974)(decided under prior law).

Homicide by vehicle is not “necessarily included” within crime of aggravated vehicular homicide.

See Balsley v. State, 668 P.2d 1324,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1983).

Criminally negligent vehicular homicide is not a lesser included
offense of under the influence aggravated vehicular homicide. —

The elements of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-106(a) (criminally negligent vehicular homicide) are not sufficiently identical to part of the elements of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-106(b)(i) (“under the influence” aggravated vehicular homicide) to qualify it as a lesser-included offense of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-106(b)(i). Allen v. State, 2002 WY 48, 43 P.3d 551,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo.), cert. denied, Allen v. Wyoming, 537 U.S. 899, 123 S. Ct. 201, 154 L. Ed. 2d 170, 2002 U.S. LEXIS 6736 (U.S. 2002).

Evidence sufficient. —

Evidence was sufficient to support a reasonable inference of proof beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant was operating his truck in a reckless manner where the defendant was driving at a minimum speed of 45 miles per hour and perhaps as high as 60 miles per hour during a snow storm, the safe speed for the weather conditions was 20 miles per hour, the defendant appeared unconcerned about being in a collision, the defendant drove his truck completely off the paved portion of the interstate and slammed into a parked car with its hazard lights on, and defendant continued down the interstate one mile until his truck would go no further. Relish v. State, 860 P.2d 455,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1993). See Bloomquist v. State, 914 P.2d 812,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1996).

The evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's conviction for aggravated homicide by vehicle; defendant's girlfriend's father, who was chasing defendant in another car, was not the proximate cause of the death resulting from defendant's accident as there was no evidence the father brandished a weapon or in any other way forced defendant to flee. Orona-Rangal v. State, 2002 WY 134, 53 P.3d 1080,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2002), limited, Kite v. State, 2018 WY 94, 424 P.3d 255,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2018).

There was sufficient evidence under either of two theories

to support the verdicts of guilty returned by the jury. The jury clearly could have found criminal negligence because of the defendant's failure to stop his truck at an intersection or, if it concluded that there had been a brake failure, it could have found knowledge that the brakes were not functioning properly and criminal negligence in continuing to operate the truck with defective brakes. Dangel v. State, 724 P.2d 1145,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 610

(Wyo. 1986).

Probation given appropriate consideration, despite court's
comments on “legislative mandate” regarding drunk drivers.
—

Despite the trial court's comments on the “legislative mandate” regarding drunk drivers who kill, the facts surrounding the sentencing for aggravated homicide by vehicle reflected that probation was given appropriate consideration and, therefore, there was no error in sentencing the defendant to confinement. Volz v. State, 707 P.2d 179,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 581

(Wyo. 1985).

Sentence. —

A criminal sentence imposing a term of not less than 18 years nor more than 20 for aggravated vehicular homicide was not an abuse of discretion given the particular set of facts. Smith v. State, 922 P.2d 846,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1996).

The imposition of consecutive sentences of six to ten years's imprisonment for two counts of aggravated vehicular homicide was proper as the maximum punishment was 20 years and the court focused on the willfulness of the defendant's conduct in driving his vehicle while intoxicated. Sampsell v. State, 2001 WY 12, 17 P.3d 724,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 2001).

Sentence of two to five years for aggravated homicide by vehicle was appropriate

since it was within the statutory guidelines. Volz v. State, 707 P.2d 179,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 581

(Wyo. 1985).

Sentence of incarceration for 36 to 72 months for aggravated
vehicular homicide was not an abuse of discretion. —

Where defendant, who was 83 years of age, was convicted of aggravated vehicular homicide, the entry of his second guilty plea acted as a waiver of his right to appeal the district court's rejection of an earlier plea agreement, allowing for a suspended prison sentence, and of his right to appeal the limitation of the reconsideration hearing to 15 minutes. Moreover, despite defendant's age and medical condition, his sentence to the custody of the Wyoming Department of Corrections for incarceration for a period of not less than 36 months and not more than 72 months, based on factors such as deprecating the seriousness of aggravated homicide by vehicle, was not an abuse of discretion. Cohee v. State, 2005 WY 50, 110 P.3d 267,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 2005).

Applied

in

Harvey v. State, 596 P.2d 1386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 428

(Wyo. 1979); Ellifritz v. State, 704 P.2d 1300,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 531

(Wyo. 1985); McLaughlin v. State, 780 P.2d 964,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1989).

Quoted

in

Elliott v. State, 626 P.2d 1044,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 326

(Wyo. 1981); Bell v. State, 693 P.2d 769,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 425

(Wyo. 1985); Whitfield v. State, 781 P.2d 913,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1989); Cummings v. State, 2009 WY 130, 218 P.3d 257,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Oct. 23, 2009).

Cited

in

Redland v. State, 766 P.2d 1173,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1989); Whitney v. State, 2004 WY 118, 99 P.3d 457,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For an article, “Criminal Liability for Death Caused by Operation of Motor Vehicles in Wyoming,” see 18 Wyo. L.J. 213 (1964).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Victim Compensation and Restitution: Legislative Alternatives,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 681 (1985).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

For article, "Getting Away With Murder? Abolition of the EaganRule in Wyoming Domestic Violence/Murder Cases” , see 12 Wyo. L. Rev. 49 (2012).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal responsibility for injury or death in operation of mechanically defective motor vehicle, 88 ALR2d 1165.

What amounts to negligence within meaning of statutes penalizing negligent homicide by operation of a motor vehicle, 20 ALR3d 473.

Homicide by automobile as murder, 21 ALR3d 116.

Criminal liability for injury or death caused by operation of pleasure boat, 8 ALR4th 886.

Alcohol-related vehicular homicide: nature and elements of offense, 64 ALR4th 166.

§ 6-2-107.
Criminally negligent homicide.

Except under circumstances constituting a violation of W.S.

6-2-106

, a person is guilty of criminally negligent homicide if he causes the death of another person by conduct amounting to criminal negligence.

Criminally negligent homicide is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 215, § 1.

The principal distinction between criminally negligent homicide

(§ 6-2-107(a)) and involuntary manslaughter (§ 6-2-105(a)(ii)) is whether the defendant consciously disregarded a substantial and unjustifiable risk or whether he failed, through criminal negligence, to perceive that risk.
Murray v. State, 855 P.2d 350,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. July 20, 1993), cert. denied, 510 U.S. 1045, 114 S. Ct. 693, 126 L. Ed. 2d 660, 1994 U.S. LEXIS 129 (U.S. 1994).

Relationship to felony murder. —

A defendant may be convicted for both felony murder under § 6-2-101(a) and criminally negligent homicide under subsection (a) of this section; these crimes are not mutually exclusive. Harris v. State, 933 P.2d 1114,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1997).

Instructions proper. —

Under plain error review, instructions given in a voluntary manslaughter case were sufficient to capture the specific nuances of a unique crime where a victim died after defendant struck him in the face during an argument over drinking; the jury was given an elements instructions, definitions of voluntary and heat of passion, and a lesser-included instruction on criminally negligent homicide.
Lopez v. State, 2006 WY 97, 139 P.3d 445,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2006).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Homicide: liability where death immediately results from treatment or mistreatment of injury inflicted by defendant, 50 ALR5th 467.

§ 6-2-108.
Drug induced homicide; penalty.

A person is guilty of drug induced homicide if:

He is an adult or is at least four (4) years older than the victim; and

He violates W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(i) or (ii) or (b)(i) or (ii) by unlawfully delivering a controlled substance to a minor and that minor dies as a result of the injection, inhalation, ingestion or administration by any other means of any amount of that controlled substance.

Except as provided in W.S.

6-2-109

, drug induced homicide is a felony punishable by imprisonment in the penitentiary for not more than twenty (20) years.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 119, § 1; 2010, ch. 54, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b), added “Except as provided in W.S.

6-2-109

.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6-2-109.
Sentencing enhancement for the homicide of a pregnant woman.

Upon sentencing of a defendant who is convicted of an offense pursuant to W.S. 6-2-104(a),

6-2-105

or

6-2-108

, if the jury has found that the victim was pregnant at the time of the commission of the offense and that the defendant knew that the victim was pregnant at the time of the commission of the offense, the court shall impose a sentence as follows:

For a conviction of W.S. 6-2-104(a), imprisonment in the penitentiary for any term not less than forty (40) years, or during life; or

For a conviction of W.S.

6-2-105

or

6-2-108

, imprisonment in the penitentiary for any term not less than ten (10) years and not more than thirty (30) years.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 54, § 1; 2021 ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, deleted "causing the involuntary termination of the pregnancy" at the end of the section heading; and substituted "6-2-104(a)" for "6-2-104" in (a) and (a)(i).

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 54, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited in

Webb v. State, 2017 WY 108, 401 P.3d 914,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2017).